Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2204
Severability.

If any provisions of this code or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the code which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this code are declared to be severable.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 4, UPC § 1-104.